Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,109.01
Fuel used for buses; exemption from tax; when; equalization fee; section, how construed; refund.

(1) Compressed fuel shall be exempt from the taxes imposed under the Compressed Fuel Tax Act when the fuel is used for buses equipped to carry more than seven persons for hire and engaged entirely in the transportation of passengers for hire within municipalities or within a radius of six miles thereof.

(2) The owner or agent of any bus equipped to carry more than seven persons for hire and engaged entirely in the transportation of passengers for hire within municipalities, or within a radius of six miles thereof, in lieu of the excise tax provided for in the act, shall pay an equalization fee of a sum equal to twice the amount of the registration fee applicable to such vehicle under the laws of this state. Such equalization fee shall be paid in the same manner as the registration fee and be disbursed and allocated as registration fees.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as permitting compressed fuel to be sold tax exempt. The department shall refund tax paid on compressed fuel used in buses deemed exempt by this section.

Laws 1996, LB 1121, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 42.